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DIASJ-02

DTC C 1555 /55 Predriver Malfuncion

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the predriver, it turns the warning light on and records the
DTC at the same time, and then stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Even when the estimated value of the motor power source
C1555/55 currentis atleast 10 A, the system detects thatthe actual mo-
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tor power source current is less than 3 A for 0.1 sec. "VGRSECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
After the procedure, perform the counter clearance (See page DI-106).

1 Checkforanopenorshortcircuitinthe harness and connector between termi-
nal PGND of VGRS ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:

Turn the ignition switch OFF.

CHECK:

Check continuity between terminal PGND of VGRS ECU and

% TTeTE (g g L body ground.
OK:
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NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.
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2CHeckoutputof DTCC 1522/22.

PGND

CHECK:
Turn the ignition switch ON and check the DTC (See page DI-91).

OK:
OK%W of DTCC 1522/22.

DTCC 1522/22is present

B

Replace VGRS ECU.
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